Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 8. Permits

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “issuing or denying” permit for discharge of pollutants within meaning of § 509(b)(1)(F) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1369(b)(1)(F)) which authorizes judicial review of such action by administrator of environmental protection agency, 67 ALR Fed 365.

What constitutes “discharge of dredged or fill material” into navigable waters, so as to be subject to permit requirements under § 404(a) of Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1344(a)), 72 ALR Fed 703.

Application of § 165 of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7475), pertaining to preconstruction requirements for prevention of significant deterioration, to particular emission sources, 86 ALR Fed 255.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-801.
Issuance of permits and licenses.

When the department has, by rule or regulation, required a permit to be obtained it is the duty of the director to issue such permits upon proof by the applicant that the procedures of this act and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder have been complied with. In granting permits, the director may impose such conditions as may be necessary to accomplish the purpose of this act which are not inconsistent with the existing rules, regulations and standards. An administrator shall not issue permits and may issue a license under this act only as specifically authorized in this act.

Except as otherwise provided in this act the director shall take final action on any application for permit or extension thereof within sixty (60) days after receipt of same unless public notice or hearing is required by state or federal statute.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a permit to construct is required before construction or modification of any industrial facility capable of causing or increasing air or water pollution in excess of standards established by the department is commenced.

General permits shall be issued solely in accordance with procedures set forth by regulation adopted by the council. Procedures for the issuances of general permits shall include public notice and an opportunity for comment. All department authorizations to use general permits under this section shall be available for public comment for thirty (30) days. Any aggrieved party may appeal the authorization as provided in this act.

Except for sources required to have a permit before construction or modification under the applicable requirements of W.S.

35-11-203

and sources specified by the director, if an applicant for an air quality permit for an oil or gas exploration or production well, with its associated equipment, has submitted a timely and complete application for a permit to construct or modify within ninety (90) days of the first date of production of the oil and gas operation, the applicant’s failure to have a permit shall not be a violation of this section. An applicant complies with this section if the applicant demonstrates to the administrator of the air quality division that the oil and gas exploration or production activity qualifies as a nonmajor source. The application shall contain, at a minimum, a demonstration that the applicant will apply the best available control technology to the oil and gas production and exploration activity.

As used in subsection (e) of this section, “first date of production” means the date permanent production equipment is in place and product is consistently flowing to sales lines, gathering lines or storage tanks. Production occurring during well completion activities which is routed to temporary production equipment is considered to occur prior to the first date of production. If extended periods of time pass between zone completions but production from initially completed zones is consistently flowing to permanent production equipment, the first date of production is the date when production from the initial zones began consistently flowing to the permanent production equipment, even though more zones will be completed later.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.47; Laws 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; ch. 70, § 2; 2012, ch. 109, § 1; 2015 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2012 amendment,

added (d).

Laws 2012, ch. 109, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (c), added the exception at the beginning; and added (e) and (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Emissions Outside Routine Operations. —

In determining a proposed facility's potential to emit sulfur dioxide, emissions from cold starts and malfunctions did not have to be considered because they were not routine operations; moreover, they would be regulated as excess emissions if they exceeded the limit in the air quality permit.
Sierra Club v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2011 WY 42, 251 P.3d 310,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited in

Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality v. Wyo. Outdoor Council, 2012 WY 135,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Oct 19, 2012).

§ 35-11-802.
Refusal to grant permits; applicant's rights.

If the director refuses to grant any permit under this act, the applicant may petition for a hearing before the council to contest the decision. The council shall give a public notice of such hearing. At such hearing, the director and appropriate administrator shall appear as respondent and the rules of practice and procedure adopted by the council pursuant to this act and the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] shall apply. The burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner. The council must take final action on any such hearing within thirty (30) days from date of hearing.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.48.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Evidence outside the record was properly considered. —

Evidence outside the record was properly considered by the Wyoming Environmental Quality Council with regard to the use of best available control technology in a proposed facility. The Council is not limited to reviewing the administrative record prior to issuing an air quality permit but instead conducts a contested case hearing at which all parties are afforded the opportunity to present new evidence.
Sierra Club v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2011 WY 42, 251 P.3d 310,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited in

Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality v. Wyo. Outdoor Council, 2012 WY 135,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Oct 19, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

§ 35-11-803.
Single permit for activities covered by more than one article.

The director may grant a single permit for a facility or activity regulated under more than one (1) article of this act provided that there is compliance with all rules, standards and public participation requirements provided by the individual articles of this act.

The council may adopt unified rules which encompass activities covered by more than one (1) article of this act.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 79, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).